Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1848.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97B.646, is amended to read: 97B.646 WOLF MANAGEMENT. new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Wolf management plan. new text end deleted text begin (a)deleted text end The commissioner, in consultation with the commissioner of agriculture, shall adopt a wolf management plan that includes goals to ensure the long-term survival of the wolf in Minnesota, to reduce conflicts between wolves and humans, to minimize depredation of livestock and domestic pets, and to manage the ecological impact of wolves on prey species and other predators. new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Wolf mortality. new text end deleted text begin (b)deleted text end The commissioner shall compile a list that is updated quarterly on known wolf deaths, based on reporting by conservation officers. The list must specify the date and location of each wolf death and must be available on the department website. new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Wolf population survey. new text end new text begin The commissioner must annually conduct a statewide wolf population survey to estimate the state's wolf population. The survey must be conducted statewide and not limited to the historic wolf range or otherwise limited to a portion of the state. new text end